District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1102.03

Board of Directors; appointment.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 203, 43 DCR 4962
Oct. 8, 1997, D.C. Law 12-43, § 2(a), 44 DCR 5763
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-285, § 4(a), 46 DCR 1355
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(a), 48 DCR 4047

History

1981 Ed., § 32-262.3.

Prior Codifications

For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 44-1101.01.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the CFO Membership on the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Board, Council Review of Board promulgations, and conditional Approval of Organizational and Operational Plan Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-137, September 30, 1997, 44 DCR 5765), and see § 2(a) of the CFO Membership on the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Board, Council Review of Board Promulgations, and Conditional Approval of Organizational and Operational Plan Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-242, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 638).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(a) of the Confirmation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-92, June 15, 1999, 46 DCR 5330).

Emergency Legislation